Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 469.033, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Operation area as taxing district, special tax. All of the territory included within the area of operation of any authority shall constitute a taxing district for the purpose of levying and collecting special benefit taxes as provided in this subdivision. All of the taxable property, both real and personal, within that taxing district shall be deemed to be benefited by projects to the extent of the special taxes levied under this subdivision. Subject to the consent by resolution of the governing body of the city in and for which it was created, an authority may levy a tax upon all taxable property within that taxing district. The tax shall be extended, spread, and included with and as a part of the general taxes for state, county, and municipal purposes by the county auditor, to be collected and enforced therewith, together with the penalty, interest, and costs. As the tax, including any penalties, interest, and costs, is collected by the county treasurer it shall be accumulated and kept in a separate fund to be known as the "housing and redevelopment project fund." The money in the fund shall be turned over to the authority at the same time and in the same manner that the tax collections for the city are turned over to the city, and shall be expended only for the purposes of sections 469.001 to 469.047. It shall be paid out upon vouchers signed by the chair of the authority or an authorized representative. The amount of the levy shall be an amount approved by the governing body of the city, but shall not exceed deleted text begin 0.0185deleted text end new text begin 0.037new text end percent of estimated market value. The authority shall each year formulate and file a budget in accordance with the budget procedure of the city in the same manner as required of executive departments of the city or, if no budgets are required to be filed, by August 1. The amount of the tax levy for the following year shall be based on that budget. The requirements of section 275.067 apply to a housing and redevelopment authority that has not previously certified a levy.